Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1046.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Poet Laureate Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Pennsylvania Poet Laureate Nomination Committee established by this act."Poet laureate." The Pennsylvania Poet Laureate established by this act.Section 3. Pennsylvania Poet Laureate.1234567891011121314151617 (a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Poet Laureate is established.(b) Appointment.--The poet laureate shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of individuals nominated by the committee as provided in section 4.(c) Term.--The poet laureate shall serve for a term of two years.(d) Duties.--The poet laureate shall:(1) Give an official reading of a poem at the inauguration of the Governor.(2) Give an official reading of a poem at the biannual opening of the legislative session upon request of the President pro tempore of the Senate or Speaker of the House of Representatives.(3) Serve at official commemorations upon request of the Governor.(e) Reimbursement of expenses.--The poet laureate shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.Section 4. Pennsylvania Poet Laureate Nomination Committee.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Poet Laureate Nomination Committee is established.(b) Membership.--The committee shall include the following:(1) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(2) The chair of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Council on the Arts or a designee.(3) The State Librarian of the State Library of Pennsylvania or a designee.(4) A representative from a nonprofit organization whose 20250HB1046PN1135 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mission is to promote poetry or the humanities and is located in this Commonwealth, appointed by the Governor.(5) A representative from a college or university department of English located in this Commonwealth, appointed by the Governor.(c) Duties.--The committee shall:(1) Determine the qualifications of nominees for the poet laureate.(2) Solicit nominations and provide the Governor with a list consisting of no more than three nominees.(d) Reimbursement of expenses.--The members of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1046PN1135 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516